Nebraska, session 109, LB538.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB538 LB538
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, antisemitic
discrimination or antisemitism has the same meaning as the International
Holocaust Remembrance Alliance's working definition of antisemitism,
including its contemporary examples, as adopted on May 26, 2016.
(2) Each school board shall adopt a policy relating to
discrimination and antisemitism. Such policy shall:
(a) Prohibit discrimination against a student or an employee of such
school district on the basis of race, ethnicity, national origin, sex,
disability, religion, or marital status;
(b) Prohibit denying the benefits of any education program, class,
or activity offered or sponsored by such school district on the basis of
race, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital
status;
(c) Ensure the criteria for admission to an education program or
class does not have the effect of restricting access by persons of a
particular race, ethnicity, national origin, disability, religion, or
marital status;
(d) Require all education programs or classes offered by such school
district be made available without discrimination on the basis of race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status;
(e) Require guidance or counseling services and financial assistance
services be made available to all students equally, regardless of race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status;
(f) Treat harassment or discrimination against students or employees
or resulting from institutional policies or programs of such school
district motivated by, or including, antisemitic discrimination in an
identical manner to harassment or discrimination motivated by race;
(g) Require that the definition of antisemitism provided in this
section be included in the student and employee code of conduct of such
school district and include antisemitism as prohibited conduct;
(3) Each school board shall include antisemitism awareness training
-2-

LB538 LB538
2025 2025
as part of other trainings on harassment provided by such school district
to students and employees.
(4) Each school district shall formally report any incident or
complaint of antisemitic discrimination and harassment to the State
Department of Education for referral to the Title VI coordinator as
provided in section 2 of this act.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with
federal or state discrimination laws or diminish or infringe upon any
right protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the
United States.
Sec. 2. (1) The Commissioner of Education shall designate an
individual to fulfill the roles and duties of the Title VI coordinator
within the State Department of Education.
(2) The Title VI coordinator shall monitor discrimination and
harassment in school districts, including antisemitic discrimination as
defined in section 1 of this act. Duties of the coordinator include, but
are not limited to, investigating all complaints of discrimination or
harassment in school districts in violation of the policy required
pursuant to section 1 of this act and filing an annual report.
(3) If, after a reasonable investigation, the coordinator determines
that a school district has engaged in, allowed, or not sufficiently
prohibited discrimination or harassment, including antisemitic
discrimination, in violation of such policy or the federal Civil Rights
Act of 1964, the coordinator shall give written notice to such
determination to the school board and require the school board to address
such violation and comply with such policy and act. If the school board
does not comply within thirty days after written notice by the
coordinator, the coordinator shall report its finding to the United
States Department of Education and the United States Department of
Justice by making a complaint under Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of
1964.
-3-

LB538 LB538
2025 2025
(4) The coordinator shall annually submit a report electronically to
the Legislature relating to discrimination and harassment in schools,
including antisemitism. Such report shall detail the number of incidents
or complaints received and the resolution, if any. Such report shall not
identify any particular individual, employee, or student.
Sec. 3. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) For purposes of this section, antisemitic discrimination or
antisemitism has the same meaning as the International Holocaust
Remembrance Alliance's working definition of antisemitism, including its
contemporary examples, as adopted on May 26, 2016; and
(b) Postsecondary educational institution means the University of
Nebraska, a state college, or a community college.
(2) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, the Board of
Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, and the board of governors of
any community college shall adopt a policy for their respective
postsecondary educational institution relating to discrimination and
antisemitism. Such policy shall:
(a) Prohibit discrimination against a student or an employee of such
postsecondary educational institution on the basis of race, ethnicity,
national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status;
(b) Prohibit denying the benefits of any education program, class,
or activity offered or sponsored by such postsecondary educational
institution on the basis of race, ethnicity, national origin, sex,
disability, religion, or marital status;
(c) Ensure the criteria for admission to an education program or
class does not have the effect of restricting access by persons of a
particular race, ethnicity, national origin, disability, religion, or
marital status;
(d) Require all education programs or classes offered by such
postsecondary educational institution be made available without
discrimination on the basis of race, ethnicity, national origin, sex,
-4-

LB538 LB538
2025 2025
disability, religion, or marital status;
(e) Require guidance or counseling services and financial assistance
services be made available to all students equally, regardless of race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status;
(f) Treat harassment or discrimination against students or employees
or resulting from institutional policies or programs of such
postsecondary educational institution motivated by, or including,
antisemitic discrimination in an identical manner to harassment or
discrimination motivated by race;
(g) Require that the definition of antisemitism provided in this
section be included in the student and employee code of conduct of such
postsecondary educational institution and include antisemitism as
prohibited conduct;
(3) Each school board shall include antisemitism awareness training
as part of other trainings on harassment provided by such postsecondary
educational institution to students and employees.
(4) Each postsecondary educational institution shall formally report
any incident or complaint of antisemitic discrimination and harassment to
the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education for referral to
the Title VI coordinator as provided in section 6 of this act.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with
federal or state discrimination laws or diminish or infringe upon any
right protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the
United States.
Sec. 4. Section 85-1401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1401 Sections 85-1401 to 85-1420 and section 6 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Coordinating Commission for
Postsecondary Education Act.
Sec. 5. Section 85-1411, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-5-

LB538 LB538
2025 2025
85-1411 To assist it in carrying out its duties, the commission
shall:
(1) Employ an executive director and all other employees of the
office of the commission and hire consultants as may be necessary and
prescribe their duties and designate a Title VI coordinator as prescribed
in section 6 of this act;
(2) Except as may be provided pursuant to the State Employees
Collective Bargaining Act, fix the compensation of the officers and
employees of the office and provide benefits for all present or future
employees of the commission, including retirement benefits, group life
insurance, group hospital-medical insurance, and group long-term
disability income insurance;
(3) Pay expenses for the recruitment of administrative and
professional personnel for the commission; and
(4) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act or as otherwise provided in the Coordinating
Commission for Postsecondary Education Act to carry out the Coordinating
Commission for Postsecondary Education Act and the powers and duties of
the commission, except that for sections 85-1402 and 85-1413 to 85-1416,
the provisions in section 84-908 for approval of the adoption, amendment,
or repeal of any rule or regulation by the Governor shall not apply.
Sec. 6. (1) The Coordinating Commission on Postsecondary Education
shall designate an individual to fulfill the roles and duties of the
Title VI coordinator within the commission.
(2) The Title VI coordinator shall monitor discrimination and
harassment in public institutions, including antisemitic discrimination
as defined in section 4 of this act. Duties of the coordinator include,
but are not limited to, investigating all complaints of discrimination or
harassment in public institutions in violation of the policy required
pursuant to section 3 of this act and filing an annual report.
(3) If, after a reasonable investigation, the coordinator determines
-6-

LB538 LB538
2025 2025
that a public institution has engaged in, allowed, or not sufficiently
prohibited discrimination or harassment, including antisemitic
discrimination, in violation of such policy or the federal Civil Rights
Act of 1964, the coordinator shall give written notice to such
determination to the governing board and require the governing board to
address such violation and comply with such policy and act. If the
governing board does not comply within thirty days after written notice
by the coordinator, the coordinator shall report its finding to the
United States Department of Education and the United States Department of
Justice by making a complaint under Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of
1964.
(4) The coordinator shall annually submit a report electronically to
the Legislature relating to discrimination and harassment in public
institutions, including antisemitism. Such report shall detail the number
of incidents or complaints received and the resolution, if any. Such
report shall not identify any particular individual, employee, or
student.
Sec. 7. Original sections 85-1401 and 85-1411, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-7-